apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="br/ing__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ings</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cost__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="b/uy__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>uy</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>uy</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>uys</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>uying</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>uying</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>uying</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ca/tch__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>tch</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>tch</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>tches</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ught</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ught</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>tching</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>tching</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>tching</l>        <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="chid/e__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>den</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l></l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cho/ose__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ose</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ose</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>oses</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>se</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>sen</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>osing</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>osing</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>osing</l>        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cl/ing__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ings</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ung</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ung</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cl/othe__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>othe</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>othe</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>othes</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ad</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ad</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>othing</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>othing</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>othing</l>        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="control__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>led</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>led</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ling</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ling</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ling</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ke/ep__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ep</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ep</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eps</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>pt</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>pt</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eping</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eping</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eping</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="unravel"><i>unravel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chisel"><i>chisel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="surveil"><i>surveil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="catch up"><i>ca</i><par n="ca/tch__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="catch sight of"><i>ca</i><par n="ca/tch__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sight<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>sight<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="level"><i>level</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="keep"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hurt"><i>hurt</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shovel"><i>shovel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buy"><i>b</i><par n="b/uy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buy out"><i>b</i><par n="b/uy__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bring up"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bring in"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bring"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="burst"><i>burst</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="catch"><i>ca</i><par n="ca/tch__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cancel"><i>cancel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cast"><i>cast</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="choose"><i>cho</i><par n="cho/ose__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="control"><i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="control oneself"><i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/><p><l><b/>oneself</l><r><g><b/>oneself</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="level"><i>level</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cost"><i>cost</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="counsel"><i>counsel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dispel"><i>dispel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="expel"><i>expel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fulfil"><i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="keep on"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="keep up"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="keep"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="label"><i>label</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="read"><i>read</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repel"><i>repel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="signal"><i>signal</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sleep"><i>sle</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="swing"><i>sw</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sweep"><i>swe</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="thrust"><i>thrust</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="travel"><i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="travel across"><i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="weep"><i>we</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
